Tennessee statutes. Title 44 Animals And Animal Husbandry
Part 2

Registration of Cattle Brands

44-7-201. Part definitions.

As used in this part, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Brand” means any recorded identification mark applied to any position on the hide of a live animal by means of heat, acid or chemical, except tattoo marks in the ear or numbers used to keep production records or record of age;

“Commissioner” means the commissioner of agriculture;

“Department” means the department of agriculture;

“Livestock hide dealer” means any dealer or person who buys hides;

“Livestock market” means a place where a person assembles livestock for public sale if the person is required to procure a license or permit from the department to operate such market; and

“Person” means any individual, partnership, corporation or association.

Acts 1959, ch. 311, § 1; T.C.A., § 44-1210.

Cross-References. Brands and trade-marks of timber, §43-28-311.

Annual license fee for distributors of commercial fertilizers, §43-11-104.

Registration of products, registered brands, §43-8-104.

44-7-202. Registration of brands by department of agriculture — Fees — Issuance of certificate.

Any owner who uses a brand to identify cattle, hogs, sheep, goats, horses, and other animals belonging to that owner must submit an application to the department to register the owner's brand.

The application shall be made on forms prescribed and furnished by the department and shall be accompanied by payment of a fee set by rule pursuant to § 43-1-703 and a facsimile of the brand to be registered. If the brand described in the application closely resembles another brand previously registered by another owner, the commissioner may reject the application for registration, but in the event the brand does not closely resemble another brand previously registered, the commissioner shall issue to the applicant a certificate of registration.

A person having a brand duly registered with the department may transfer the brand to another person by notifying the department of the transfer and giving the date of transfer and the name of the transferee. Upon receipt of the notice, the department shall note the brand transfer and the name of the transferee in its register of brands. The transferee shall not use the transferred brand until the department notifies the transferee that the brand transfer has been noted on the department's register.

Acts 1959, ch. 311, § 2; 1970, ch. 374, § 1; T.C.A., § 44-1211; Acts 2015, ch. 485, § 18.

Compiler's Note. The 2015 amendment rewrote the section, which read: “(a) Any owner who uses a brand to identify cattle, hogs, sheep, goats, horses, and other animals belonging to that owner must register the owner's brand by applying to the department for registration.“(b) The application shall be made on forms prescribed and furnished by the department and shall be accompanied by a fee of ten dollars ($10.00), and a facsimile of the brand to be registered shall also accompany the application.“(c) All fees collected under this part for registration, transfer, and reregistration of brands shall be credited to the department and kept in a separate account for the purpose of defraying the cost of administering this part.“(d) If the brand described in the application closely resembles another registered brand previously registered by another owner, the commissioner may reject the application for registration, but in the event the brand does not closely resemble another brand previously registered, the commissioner shall issue to the applicant a certificate of registration.“(e) In the event the department denies registration of a brand, for any reason, the registration fee of ten dollars ($10.00) shall be returned to the applicant.“(f) A person having a brand duly registered with the department may transfer the brand to another by notifying the department of the transfer and giving the date of transfer and the name of the transferee. Upon receipt of the notice, and a transfer fee of one dollar ($1.00), the transfer of the registration shall be noted in the register of brands showing that the brand has been transferred and giving the name of the transferee. The transferred brand shall not be used by the new owner until the department notifies the transferee that the transfer has been noted on its register.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2015, ch. 485, § 41. July 1, 2015; May 20, 2015, for the purpose of promulgating rules.

Cross-References. Record keeping and reporting of livestock brands required by stockyards, slaughterhouses and packing houses, §44-7-110.

44-7-203. Copy of certificate evidence of registration.

In all suits at law or in equity, or in any criminal proceedings involving the title or right of possession of branded cattle, hogs, sheep, goats, horses, and other animals, a copy of the certificate of the brand registration, verified by the affidavit of the commissioner, shall be received in evidence by the court as evidence of the registration of the brand in accordance with the requirements of this part.

Acts 1959, ch. 311, § 3; 1970, ch. 374, § 1; T.C.A., § 44-1212.

44-7-204. Reregistration of brands periodically — Fee — Forfeiture upon failure.

Every five (5) years, all brands shall be reregistered with the department. At least ninety (90) days prior to the date for reregistration of all brands, the department shall notify all persons having brands registered as to the date by which the brand must be reregistered. On or before the reregistration date, the person in whose name the brand is registered shall furnish any additional information as the department may require on forms furnished by the department. If any person having a registered brand fails to reregister the brand in that person's name, the brand shall be forfeited and shall be available for registration in the name of another person.

Acts 1959, ch. 311, § 4; T.C.A., § 44-1213; Acts 2015, ch. 485, § 19.

Amendments. The 2015 amendment , in the third sentence, deleted “pay to the department a reregistration fee of two dollars ($2.00), and shall” preceding “furnish” and substituted “any additional” for “such additional”.

Effective Dates. Acts 2015, ch. 485, § 41. July 1, 2015; May 20, 2015, for the purpose of promulgating rules.

44-7-205. Register of brands — Publication.

The department shall maintain a complete register of all brands, showing the name and address of the owner, and shall, in accordance with the rules, regulations, policies and procedures of the state publications committee, publish and distribute copies of the register in booklet form, and supplemental copies thereof, to every livestock market and county clerk in the state. Copies of the register of brands may be furnished to other persons requesting them at a price to be determined by the commissioner.

Acts 1959, ch. 311, § 5; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 22, 36; T.C.A., § 44-1214; Acts 1990, ch. 1024, § 20.

44-7-206. Copies of register to be available for inspection.

Every operator of a livestock market where cattle, hogs, sheep, goats, horses, and other animals are sold shall keep a copy of the register of brands in that person's place of business where it will be accessible for public inspection.

Acts 1959, ch. 311, § 6; 1970, ch. 374, § 1; T.C.A., § 44-1215.

44-7-207. Rules and regulations promulgated by commissioner.

The commissioner has the authority to promulgate such rules and regulations as are reasonably necessary to carry out the intent and purpose of this part so as to facilitate the tracing and identification of cattle, hogs, sheep, goats, horses, and other animals, and afford protection against stealing and unlawful dealing in cattle, hogs, sheep, goats, horses, and other animals.

Acts 1959, ch. 311, § 7; 1970, ch. 374, § 1; T.C.A., § 44-1216.

44-7-208. Unlawful to use unregistered brand or deface brand.

It is unlawful for:

Any person to use any brand for branding cattle, hogs, sheep, goats, horses, and other animals, unless the brand is registered with the department;

Any person to obliterate, alter or deface the brand of any animals; or

Any person operating or owning a livestock market to fail to keep a copy of the register of brands furnished to such person by the department in a place easily accessible to interested parties.

Acts 1959, ch. 311, § 8; 1970, ch. 374, § 1; T.C.A., § 44-1217.

44-7-209. Violation of this part a misdemeanor.

A person who violates any of the provisions of this part commits a Class C misdemeanor.

Acts 1959, ch. 311, § 9; T.C.A., § 44-1218; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, §40-35-111.